test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_I_miskweyaab_gt-glossing.yaml
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: miskweyaabiinsshiwaabniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiinsshiwaabniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiinsshiwaabniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: miskweyaabiinsshinwibniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiinsshinwibniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiinsshinwibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmiskweyaabiimshinaanbaniin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmiskweyaabiimshinaanbaniing
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmiskweyaabiimshinaanbaniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmiskweyaabiimshinaanbaniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmiskweyaabiimshinaanbaniing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmiskweyaabiimshinaanbaniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmiskweyaabiimshiwaabniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmiskweyaabiimshiwaabniing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmiskweyaabiimshiwaabniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: miskweyaabiimshiwaabniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiimshiwaabniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiimshiwaabniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: miskweyaabiimshinwibniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiimshinwibniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiimshinwibniin
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmiskweyaabiinymishnaanbaniin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmiskweyaabiinymishnaanbaniing
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinymishnaanbaniin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmiskweyaabiinsmishnaanbaniin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmiskweyaabiinsmishnaanbaniing
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinsmishnaanbaniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmiskweyaabiinymishnaanbaniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinymishnaanbaniing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinymishnaanbaniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmiskweyaabiinymishwaabniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinymishwaabniing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinymishwaabniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmiskweyaabiinsmishnaanbaniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinsmishnaanbaniing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinsmishnaanbaniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmiskweyaabiinsmishwaabniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinsmishwaabniing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinsmishwaabniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: miskweyaabiinymishwaabniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiinymishwaabniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiinymishwaabniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: miskweyaabiinymishniwbaniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiinymishniwbaniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiinymishniwbaniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: miskweyaabiinsmishwaabniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiinsmishwaabniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiinsmishwaabniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: miskweyaabiinsmishniwbaniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiinsmishniwbaniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiinsmishniwbaniin
     
